Utah statutes.
41-1a-210.5.   Driver license required on new registrations.
The division, before issuing any new registration on the sale of a vehicle not
sold by a vehicle dealer, shall require the applicant or person making the
application to show proof that the applicant or person making the application
has a valid driver license.
